Georgia, session 2025_26, HB315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Law Enforcement Partners Act."
SECTION 2.
Code Section 16-1-3 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to definitions
relative to crimes and offenses, is amended by adding a new paragraph to read as follows:
"(8.1) 'Law enforcement officer' means:
(A) A peace officer;
H. B. 315 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 56 0325S
(B) Any state or federal law enforcement officer who render assistance to a law
enforcement agency of this state or any political subdivision thereof in response to a
declaration of a state of emergency or disaster issued by the Governor pursuant to Code
Section 38-3-51;
(C) An appointed chief of police or department head of a law enforcement unit who
has not completed the applicable training required by Code Section 35-8-20
or 35-8-20.1 from the date of initial appointment to the date by which such training is
to be completed pursuant to the applicable Code section;
(D) An individual certified or commissioned in another state as a law enforcement
officer, peace officer, or other official as being authorized to make arrests and carry
firearms in the performance of his or her official duties who is employed by a law
enforcement agency, enforcement unit, agency, or department of this state or any
municipality, county, or other political subdivision thereof but who has not completed
the applicable training required by Chapter 8 of Title 35, the 'Georgia Peace Officer
Standards and Training Act,' provided that such individual's certification or commission
in another state remains in good standing; and
(E) A federal law enforcement officer who is employed by the United States
government as a full-time law enforcement officer, is in good standing with his or her
federal agency of employment, is authorized to carry a firearm in the performance of
his or her official duties, and is empowered to arrest a person for criminal violations of
the United States Code."
SECTION 3.
Code Section 17-4-20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to authorization
of arrests with and without warrants generally, use of deadly force, adoption or promulgation
of conflicting regulations, policies, ordinances, and resolutions, and authority of nuclear
H. B. 315 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 56 0325S
power facility security officer, is amended in subsection (a) by adding a new paragraph to
read as follows:
"(4) As used in this subsection, the term 'law enforcement officer' shall have the same
meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-1-3."
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 315 (SUB)
- 3 -